California, session 20252026, SB807.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 70900 of the Education Code is amended to read:70900. There is hereby created established the California Community Colleges, a postsecondary education system consisting of community college districts heretofore and hereafter established pursuant to law and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges. The board of governors shall carry out the functions specified in Section 70901, local districts shall carry out the functions specified in Section 70902, and the California Online Community College shall carry out the functions specified in Section 75003.